Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1155.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1325(a) introductory paragraph of Title 25 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 1325. Government agencies.(a) General rule.--The secretary shall administer a system whereby all offices in this Commonwealth that provide public assistance, each county clerk of orphans' court, including each marriage license bureau, all offices in this Commonwealth that provide State-funded programs primarily engaged in providing services to persons with disabilities, all offices in this Commonwealth that provide applications for hunting and fishing licenses and all armed forces recruitment centers do all of the following:* * *123456789101112131415161718 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1155PN1414 - 2 - 1